Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.42
Wine, defined.

Wine means any alcoholic beverage obtained
by the fermentation of the natural contents of fruits or vegetables, containing
sugar, including such beverages when fortified by the addition of alcohol
or spirits.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 50.